Utah statutes.
4-32-2.1.   Adoption of federal provisions.

(1)  The following federal laws, regulations, and standards are adopted by reference:

(a)  9 C.F.R. Part 300 through Part 500;

(b)  the Federal Meat Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.;

(c)  the Poultry Products Inspection Act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 451 et seq.; and

(d)  the Humane Slaughter Act, 7 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.

(2)  Changes to the federal laws, regulations, and standards referenced in Subsection (1) are considered incorporated as those changes are made.

